Massachusetts, session 194th, H693.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 38M and
inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 38M. School committees of cities, towns and regional school districts shall meet
at least once every other month, during the months school is in session, with a student advisory
committee to consist of five members to be composed of students elected by the student body of
the high school or high schools in each city, town or regional school district.
The board of the trustees of a charter school, as defined in section 89, shall meet at least
once every other month, during the months school is in session, with a student advisory
committee to consist of five members to be composed of students elected by the student body of
the charter school.
The members of such student advisory committees shall, by majority vote prior to the
first day of June in each year elect from their number a chairperson who shall serve for a term of
of 2

one year. Said chairperson shall be an ex-officio, nonvoting member of the school committee of
the city, town or regional school district or as an ex-officio, nonvoting member of the board of
the trustees of the charter school. Said ex-officio members shall have no right to attend executive
sessions unless such right is expressly granted by the individual school committee or board of
trustees. Said chairperson shall be subject to all school committee or board of trustee rules and
regulations and shall serve without compensation.
A school committee of a city, town or regional school district or the board of trustees of a
charter school may designate a student outreach coordinator for the purpose of ensuring the
establishment of a student advisory committee and regularly informing the advisory committee
of the school committee's or board of trustee’s agenda.
of 2